Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.131

Operating budget—Source of funds.

Funding of the operating budget of a horticultural pest and disease board may be derived from any or all of the following:

(1) Moneys from the county general fund or other general revenues, as appropriated by the board of county commissioners or other county legislative authority;

(2) A horticultural tax, as authorized in RCW 15.08.260, levied by the county board of commissioners or other county legislative authority; or

(3) An assessment against all lands.

[ 2000 c 144 s 33.]